Utah statutes.
16-11-4.   Incorporators -- Articles of incorporation.

(1)  One or more individuals, each of whom is licensed to render a professional service, may incorporate a professional corporation by filing articles of incorporation with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code. 

(2)  Articles of incorporation under Subsection (1) shall meet the requirements of Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation Act, and in addition thereto contain the following:

(a)  the profession to be practiced through the professional corporation;

(b)  the names and street or mailing addresses of all of the original shareholders, directors, and officers of the professional corporation; and

(c)  the number of shareholder members of the board of directors may be less than the number of shareholders, except if a corporation has only one shareholder, the board may consist of that shareholder.

